es: Tipo de sistema de combustible compatible: Todos los sistemas de combustible/universal; Carburado; Inyección diésel common rail; Inyección directa (GDI); Inyección de combustible en puerto (PFI); Inyección en el cuerpo del acelerador (TBI); Otro
ja: 対応燃料システムタイプ: すべての燃料システム / 汎用; キャブレター; コモンレール式ディーゼルインジェクション; 直噴 (GDI); ポート噴射 (PFI); スロットルボディインジェクション (TBI); その他
en: Compatible fuel system type: All fuel systems / universal; Carbureted; Common rail diesel injection; Direct injection (GDI); Port fuel injection (PFI); Throttle body injection (TBI); Other
zh-TW: 相容燃油系統類型: 所有燃料系統 / 通用; 化油器式; 共軌柴油噴射; 缸內直噴 (GDI); 歧管噴射 (PFI); 節氣門噴射 (TBI); 其他
ro-RO: Tip de sistem de alimentare compatibil: Toate sistemele de alimentare / universal; Cu carburator; Injecție diesel common rail; Injecție directă (GDI); Injecție indirectă (PFI); Injecție monopunct (TBI); Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de sistema de combustível compatível: Todos os sistemas de combustível/universal; Com carburador; Injeção a diesel common rail; Injeção direta (GDI); Injeção de combustível na porta (PFI); Injeção de corpo de borboleta (TBI); Outro
fr: Type de système d'alimentation compatible: Tous les systèmes de carburant / universel; À carburateur; Injection diesel à rampe commune; Injection directe (GDI); Injection indirecte (PFI); Injection monopoint (TBI); Autre
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta sustava za gorivo: Svi sustavi goriva / univerzalno; S rasplinjačem; Zajednički vod (common rail) za ubrizgavanje dizela; Izravno ubrizgavanje (GDI); Ubrizgavanje goriva u usisnu granu (PFI); Ubrizgavanje goriva u kućište leptiraste zaklopke (TBI); Ostalo
nl: Compatibel type brandstofsysteem: Alle brandstofsystemen / universeel; Met carburateur; Common-raildieselinjectie; Directe injectie (GDI); Poortbrandstofinjectie (PFI); Gasklephuisinjectie (TBI); Overig
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta sistema za gorivo: Vsi sistemi za gorivo/univerzalno; Z vplinjačem; Dizelski vbrizg prek skupnega voda (common rail); Neposredni vbrizg (GDI); Vbrizgavanje goriva v sesalno cev (PFI); Vbrizgavanje v ohišje dušilne lopute (TBI); Drugo
ru: Совместимый тип топливной системы: Все топливные системы / универсальная; Карбюраторная; Дизельная система Common rail; Прямой впрыск (GDI); Распределённый впрыск (PFI); Моновпрыск (TBI); Другое
nb: Kompatibel drivstoffsystem-type: Alle drivstoffsystemer / universell; Forgasser; Common rail-dieselinnsprøyting; Direkte innsprøyting (GDI); Portinnsprøyting (PFI); Innsprøyting i spjeldhus (TBI); Annet
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ palivového systému: Všetky palivové systémy/univerzálne; Karburátorové; Dieselové vstrekovanie Common Rail; Priame vstrekovanie (GDI); Nepriame vstrekovanie paliva (PFI); Vstrekovanie do škrtiacej klapky (TBI); Iné
da: Kompatibel brændstofssystemtype: Alle brændstofsystemer/universal; Karburator; Common rail-dieselindsprøjtning; Direkte indsprøjtning (GDI); Port-brændstofindsprøjtning (PFI); Throttle body-indsprøjtning (TBI); Andet
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo degalų sistema: Visoms degalų sistemoms / universalus; Karbiuratorinė; „Common rail“ dyzelino įpurškimas; Tiesioginis įpurškimas (GDI); Kanalinis degalų įpurškimas (PFI); Centrinis įpurškimas (TBI); Kita
el: Συμβατός τύπος συστήματος καυσίμου: Όλα τα συστήματα καυσίμου / γενικής χρήσης; Με καρμπιρατέρ; Έγχυση πετρελαίου common rail; Άμεσος ψεκασμός (GDI); Έμμεσος ψεκασμός (PFI); Ψεκασμός πολλαπλής (TBI); Άλλο
de: Kompatibler Kraftstoffsystemtyp: Alle Kraftstoffsysteme/Universal; Vergaser; Common-Rail-Dieseleinspritzung; Direkteinspritzung (GDI); Saugrohreinspritzung (PFI); Zentraleinspritzung (TBI); Sonstige
sv: Kompatibel bränslesystemtyp: Alla bränslesystem/universellt; Förgasare; Common rail-dieselinsprutning; Direktinsprutning (GDI); Portinsprutning (PFI); Centralinsprutning (TBI); Annat
pl: Zgodny typ układu paliwowego: Wszystkie układy paliwowe / uniwersalne; Gaźnikowe; Wtrysk Common Rail (Diesel); Wtrysk bezpośredni (GDI); Wtrysk pośredni (PFI); Wtrysk jednopunktowy (TBI); Inne
vi: Loại hệ thống nhiên liệu tương thích: Tất cả hệ thống nhiên liệu / đa năng; Chế hòa khí; Phun dầu diesel đường dẫn chung; Phun trực tiếp (GDI); Phun nhiên liệu vào cổng nạp (PFI); Phun nhiên liệu qua bướm ga (TBI); Khác
it: Tipo di sistema di alimentazione compatibile: Tutti i sistemi di alimentazione / universale; A carburatore; Iniezione diesel common rail; Iniezione diretta (GDI); Iniezione indiretta (PFI); Iniezione single-point (TBI); Altro
zh-CN: 兼容的燃油系统类型: 所有燃油系统/通用; 化油器式; 共轨柴油喷射; 缸内直喷 (GDI); 进气道燃油喷射 (PFI); 节气门体喷射 (TBI); 其他
ko: 호환 연료 시스템 유형: 모든 연료 시스템/범용; 기화기(카뷰레터) 방식; 커먼레일 디젤 분사; 직접 분사(GDI); 포트 연료 분사(PFI); 스로틀 바디 분사(TBI); 기타
bg-BG: Съвместим тип горивната система: Всички горивни системи / универсална; Карбураторна; Дизелово впръскване Common rail; Директно впръскване (GDI); Портово впръскване на гориво (PFI); Моноинжекция (TBI); Други
fi: Yhteensopiva polttoainejärjestelmätyyppi: Kaikki polttoainejärjestelmät / universaali; Kaasuttimella varustettu; Yhteispaineruiskutus (Common Rail); Suoraruiskutus (GDI); Monipisteruiskutus (PFI); Yksipisteruiskutus (TBI); Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de sistema de combustível compatível: Todos os sistemas de combustível / universal; Carburado; Injeção de diesel Common Rail; Injeção direta (GDI); Injeção multiponto (PFI); Injeção monoponto (TBI); Outro
cs: Typ kompatibilního palivového systému: Všechny palivové systémy / univerzální; Karburátor; Dieselové vstřikování Common Rail; Přímé vstřikování (GDI); Vícebodové vstřikování paliva (PFI); Jednobodové vstřikování paliva (TBI); Jiné
th: ประเภทระบบเชื้อเพลิงที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ระบบเชื้อเพลิงทั้งหมด/อเนกประสงค์; ใช้คาร์บูเรเตอร์; ฉีดน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิงดีเซลแบบคอมมอนเรล; ฉีดตรงเข้าห้องเผาไหม้ (GDI); ฉีดเชื้อเพลิงพอร์ต (PFI); หัวฉีดเดี่ยวที่เรือนลิ้นเร่ง (TBI); อื่นๆ
hu: Kompatibilis üzemanyagrendszer típusa: Minden üzemanyagrendszer / univerzális; Karburátoros; Közös nyomócsöves dízelbefecskendezés; Közvetlen befecskendezéses (GDI); Szívócső-befecskendezéses (PFI); Központi befecskendezéses (TBI); Egyéb
tr: Uyumlu yakıt sistemi tipi: Tüm yakıt sistemleri / evrensel; Karbüratörlü; Ortak yakıt yollu dizel enjeksiyonu; Doğrudan enjeksiyon (GDI); Port yakıt enjeksiyonu (PFI); Gaz kelebeği gövdesi enjeksiyonu (TBI); Diğer